Maryland, session 2025, HB0589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
SUBTITLE 26. PERSONAL INJURY OR DEATH CAUSED BY IMPLEMENTATION OF
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SOFTWARE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0589*

HOUSE BILL 589
3–2601.
A PERSON WHO INTENTIONALLY, KNOWINGLY, OR NEGLIGENTLY DESIGNS OR
CREATES ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SOFTWARE WITH THE CAPABILITY OF CAUSING
PERSONAL INJURY OR DEATH IS:
(1) STRICTLY LIABLE FOR DAMAGES RESULTING FROM PERSONAL
INJURY OR DEATH CAUSED BY THE USE OF THE SOFTWARE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING THE APPLICABLE
LIMITATION ON NONECONOMIC DAMAGES UNDER § 3–2A–09 OF THIS TITLE IF THE
USE OF THE SOFTWARE CAUSES PERSONAL INJURY OR DEATH.
Article – Criminal Law
1–403.
(A) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY DESIGN OR CREATE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SOFTWARE WITH THE CAPABILITY OF CAUSING
PERSONAL INJURY OR DEATH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION IS GUILTY OF A
FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 20
YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $100,000 OR BOTH.
(B) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY DESIGN OR CREATE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SOFTWARE WITH THE CAPABILITY OF CAUSING PERSONAL INJURY
OR DEATH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 10 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $50,000 OR BOTH.
(C) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT NEGLIGENTLY DESIGN OR CREATE
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SOFTWARE WITH THE CAPABILITY OF CAUSING
PERSONAL INJURY OR DEATH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $25,000 OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.

HOUSE BILL 589 3